Utah statutes.
24-1-3.5.   Jurisdiction and venue.

(1)  A state district court has jurisdiction over any action filed in accordance with this chapter regarding:

(a)  all interests in property if the property for which forfeiture is sought is within this state at the time the action is filed; and

(b)  the interests of owners or interest holders in the property, if the owner or interest holder is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the district court.

(2) (a)  In addition to the venue provided for under Title 78B, Chapter 3, Part 3, Place of Trial-Venue, or any other provisions of law, a proceeding for forfeiture under this chapter may be maintained in the judicial district in which:

(i)  any part of the property is found; or

(ii)  a civil or criminal action could be maintained against an owner or interest holder for the conduct alleged to give cause for the forfeiture.

(b)  A claimant may obtain a change of venue under Section 78B-3-309.

